en_US.aff
FLAG num
SFX 30 Y 27	
SFX 30 0 ේ  .	
SFX 30 0 ේත්  .	
SFX 30 0 ේයි  .	
SFX 30 0 ත්  .	
SFX 30 0 යි  .	
SFX 30 0 ෙන්  .	
SFX 30 0 ෙනුත්  .	
SFX 30 0 ෙනි  .	
SFX 30 0 ේකින්  .	
SFX 30 0 ේකිනුත්  .	
SFX 30 0 වලින්  .	
SFX 30 0 වලිනි  .	
SFX 30 0 ේටත්  .	
SFX 30 0 ේකට  .	
SFX 30 0 ේකටයි  .	
SFX 30 0 වලට  .	
SFX 30 0 වලටත්  .	
SFX 30 0 වලටයි  .	
SFX 30 0 ෙ  .	
SFX 30 0 ෙත්  .	
SFX 30 0 ෙයි  .	
SFX 30 0 ේක  .	
SFX 30 0 ේකත්  .	
SFX 30 0 ේකයි  .	
SFX 30 0 වල  .	
SFX 30 0 වලත්  .	
SFX 30 0 වලයි  .

SFX 31 Y 11	
SFX 31 0 ත්   .	
SFX 31 0 යි   .	
SFX 31 0 වලින්   .	
SFX 31 0 වලිනුත්  .	
SFX 31 0 වලිනි  .	
SFX 31 0 වලට  .	
SFX 31 0 වලටත්  .	
SFX 31 0 වලටයි  .	
SFX 31 0 වල  .	
SFX 31 0 වලත්  .	
SFX 31 0 වලයි  .	

SFX 32 Y 31	
SFX 32 0 ත්   .	
SFX 32 0 යි   .	
SFX 32 0 ක්  .	
SFX 32 0 කුත්  .	
SFX 32 0 කි   .	
SFX 32 0 ෙන්   .	
SFX 32 0 ෙනුත්   .	
SFX 32 0 ෙනි   .	
SFX 32 0 කිනුත්   .	
SFX 32 0 කිනි   .	
SFX 32 0 ට  .	
SFX 32 0 ටත්  .	
SFX 32 0 ටයි  .	
SFX 32 0 කට  .	
SFX 32 0 කටත්  .	
SFX 32 0 කටයි  .	
SFX 32 0 ේ  .	
SFX 32 0 ේත්  .	
SFX 32 0 ේයි  .	
SFX 32 0 ෙ  .	
SFX 32 0 ෙත්  .	
SFX 32 0 ෙයි  .	
SFX 32 0 ක  .	
SFX 32 0 කත්  .	
SFX 32 0 කයි  .	
SFX 32 0 ක  .	
SFX 32 0 කත්  .	
SFX 32 0 කයි  .	
SFX 32 0 ෙහි  .	
SFX 32 0 ෙහිත්  .	
SFX 32 0 ෙහියි  .	

SFX 33 Y 11	
SFX 33 0 ත්  .	
SFX 33 0 යි  .	
SFX 33 0 වලින්  .	
SFX 33 0 වලිනුත්  .	
SFX 33 0 වලිනි  .	
SFX 33 0 වලට  .	
SFX 33 0 වලටත්  .	
SFX 33 0 වලටයි  .	
SFX 33 0 වල  .	
SFX 33 0 වලත්  .	
SFX 33 0 වලයි  .	

SFX 34 Y 11	
SFX 34 ් ුත්   .	
SFX 34 ් ුයි   .	
SFX 34 0 වලින්   .	
SFX 34 0 වලිනි  .	
SFX 34 0 වලිනුත්  .	
SFX 34 0 වලිනුත්  .	
SFX 34 0 වලිනුත්  .	
SFX 34 0 වලිනුත්  .	
SFX 34 0 වලිනුත්  .	
SFX 34 0 වලිනුත්  .	
SFX 34 0 වලිනුත්  .	

SFX 40 Y 79 
SFX 40 0 ති  .
SFX 40 0 ත්වා  .
SFX 40 0 නවා  .
SFX 40 0 නවාලා  .
SFX 40 0 නු  .
SFX 40 0 න්න  .
SFX 40 0 න්නීය  .
SFX 40 0 න්නෙමි  .
SFX 40 0 න්නෙමිවා  .
SFX 40 0 න්නෙමු  .
SFX 40 0 න්නෙමුවා  .
SFX 40 0 න්නෙහි  .
SFX 40 0 න්නෙහිවා  .
SFX 40 0 න්නේය  .
SFX 40 0 න්නෝය  .
SFX 40 0 පන්  .
SFX 40 0 පල්ලා  .
SFX 40 0 මි  .
SFX 40 0 මිවා  .
SFX 40 0 මු  .
SFX 40 0 මුවා  .
SFX 40 0 යි  .
SFX 40 0 ව  .
SFX 40 0 වති  .
SFX 40 0 වන්නීය  .
SFX 40 0 වන්නෙමි  .
SFX 40 0 වන්නෙමු  .
SFX 40 0 වන්නෙහි  .
SFX 40 0 වන්නෙහු  .
SFX 40 0 වන්නේය  .
SFX 40 0 වන්නෝය  .
SFX 40 0 වමි  .
SFX 40 0 වමු  .
SFX 40 0 වයි  .
SFX 40 0 වහි  .
SFX 40 0 වහු  .
SFX 40 0 වු  .
SFX 40 0 හි  .
SFX 40 0 හිවා  .
SFX 40 0 හු  .
SFX 40 0 හුවා  .
SFX 40 0 ාවා  .
SFX 40 0 මින්  .
SFX 40 0 ා  .
SFX 40 0 න්නට  .
SFX 40 0 වන්නට  .
SFX 40 0 නලද  .
SFX 40 0 නුලැබූ  .
SFX 40 0 වමින්  .
SFX 40 0 ද්දී  .
SFX 40 0 නලදී  .
SFX 40 0 ුණු  .
SFX 40 0 ූ  .
SFX 40 0 ුවෙමි  .
SFX 40 0 ුවෙමු  .
SFX 40 0 ුවෙහි  .
SFX 40 0 ුවෙහු  .
SFX 40 0 ුවාය  .
SFX 40 0 ුවේය  .
SFX 40 0 ුවෝය  .
SFX 40 0 ේ  .
SFX 40 0 ෙමි  .
SFX 40 0 ෙමු  .
SFX 40 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 40 0 ෙහු  .
SFX 40 0 ෙයි  .
SFX 40 0 ෙති  .
SFX 40 0 වෙයි  .
SFX 40 0 වෙති  .
SFX 40 0 වේ  .
SFX 40 0 ිය  .
SFX 40 0 ුවොත්  .
SFX 40 0 ුවේ  .
SFX 40 0 න්නේ  .
SFX 40 0 න  .
SFX 40 0 නට  .
SFX 40 0 බලවා  .
SFX 40 0 වන්නේ  .
SFX 40 0 නුයේ  .

SFX 41 Y 79	
SFX 41 0 ති  .	
SFX 41 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 41 0 නවා  .	
SFX 41 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 41 0 නු  .	
SFX 41 0 න්න  .	
SFX 41 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 41 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 41 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 41 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 41 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 41 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 41 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 41 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 41 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 41 0 පන්  .	
SFX 41 0 පල්ලා  .	
SFX 41 0 මි  .	
SFX 41 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 41 0 මු  .	
SFX 41 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 41 0 යි  .	
SFX 41 0 ව  .	
SFX 41 0 වති  .	
SFX 41 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 41 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 41 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 41 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 41 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 41 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 41 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 41 0 වමි  .	
SFX 41 0 වමු  .	
SFX 41 0 වයි  .	
SFX 41 0 වහි  .	
SFX 41 0 වහු  .	
SFX 41 0 වු  .	
SFX 41 0 හි  .	
SFX 41 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 41 0 හු  .	
SFX 41 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 41 0 ාවා  .	
SFX 41 0 මින්  .	
SFX 41 0 ා  .	
SFX 41 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 41 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 41 0 නලද  .	
SFX 41 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 41 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 41 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 41 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 41 0 ුණු  .	
SFX 41 0 ූ  .	
SFX 41 0 ුවෙමි  .	
SFX 41 0 ුවෙමු  .	
SFX 41 0 ුවෙහි  .	
SFX 41 0 ුවෙහු  .	
SFX 41 0 ුවාය  .	
SFX 41 0 ුවේය  .	
SFX 41 0 ුවෝය  .	
SFX 41 0 ේ  .	
SFX 41 0 ෙමි  .	
SFX 41 0 ෙමු  .	
SFX 41 0 ෙහි  .	
SFX 41 0 ෙහු  .	
SFX 41 0 ෙයි  .	
SFX 41 0 ෙති  .	
SFX 41 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 41 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 41 0 වේ  .	
SFX 41 0 ිය  .	
SFX 41 0 ුවොත්  .	
SFX 41 0 ුවේ  .	
SFX 41 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 41 0 න  .	
SFX 41 0 නට  .	
SFX 41 0 බලවා  .	
SFX 41 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 41 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 42 Y 79
SFX 42 0 ති  .
SFX 42 0 ත්වා  .
SFX 42 0 නවා  .
SFX 42 0 නවාලා  .
SFX 42 0 නු  .
SFX 42 0 න්න  .
SFX 42 0 න්නීය  .
SFX 42 0 න්නෙමි  .
SFX 42 0 න්නෙමිවා  .
SFX 42 0 න්නෙමු  .
SFX 42 0 න්නෙමුවා  .
SFX 42 0 න්නෙහි  .
SFX 42 0 න්නෙහිවා  .
SFX 42 0 න්නේය  .
SFX 42 0 න්නෝය  .
SFX 42 0 පන්  .
SFX 42 0 පල්ලා  .
SFX 42 0 මි  .
SFX 42 0 මිවා  .
SFX 42 0 මු  .
SFX 42 0 මුවා  .
SFX 42 0 යි  .
SFX 42 0 ව  .
SFX 42 0 වති  .
SFX 42 0 වන්නීය  .
SFX 42 0 වන්නෙමි  .
SFX 42 0 වන්නෙමු  .
SFX 42 0 වන්නෙහි  .
SFX 42 0 වන්නෙහු  .
SFX 42 0 වන්නේය  .
SFX 42 0 වන්නෝය  .
SFX 42 0 වමි  .
SFX 42 0 වමු  .
SFX 42 0 වයි  .
SFX 42 0 වහි  .
SFX 42 0 වහු  .
SFX 42 0 වු  .
SFX 42 0 හි  .
SFX 42 0 හිවා  .
SFX 42 0 හු  .
SFX 42 0 හුවා  .
SFX 42 0 ාවා  .
SFX 42 0 මින්  .
SFX 42 0 ා  .
SFX 42 0 න්නට  .
SFX 42 0 වන්නට  .
SFX 42 0 නලද  .
SFX 42 0 නුලැබූ  .
SFX 42 0 වමින්  .
SFX 42 0 ද්දී  .
SFX 42 0 නලදී  .
SFX 42 0 ුණු  .
SFX 42 0 ූ  .
SFX 42 0 ුවෙමි  .
SFX 42 0 ුවෙමු  .
SFX 42 0 ුවෙහි  .
SFX 42 0 ුවෙහු  .
SFX 42 0 ුවාය  .
SFX 42 0 ුවේය  .
SFX 42 0 ුවෝය  .
SFX 42 0 ේ  .
SFX 42 0 ෙමි  .
SFX 42 0 ෙමු  .
SFX 42 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 42 0 ෙහු  .
SFX 42 0 ෙයි  .
SFX 42 0 ෙති  .
SFX 42 0 වෙයි  .
SFX 42 0 වෙති  .
SFX 42 0 වේ  .
SFX 42 0 ිය  .
SFX 42 0 ුවොත්  .
SFX 42 0 ුවේ  .
SFX 42 0 න්නේ  .
SFX 42 0 න  .
SFX 42 0 නට  .
SFX 42 0 බලවා  .
SFX 42 0 වන්නේ  .
SFX 42 0 නුයේ  .

SFX 43 Y 79
SFX 43 0 ති  .
SFX 43 0 ත්වා  .
SFX 43 0 නවා  .
SFX 43 0 නවාලා  .
SFX 43 0 නු  .
SFX 43 0 න්න  .
SFX 43 0 න්නීය  .
SFX 43 0 න්නෙමි  .
SFX 43 0 න්නෙමිවා  .
SFX 43 0 න්නෙමු  .
SFX 43 0 න්නෙමුවා  .
SFX 43 0 න්නෙහි  .
SFX 43 0 න්නෙහිවා  .
SFX 43 0 න්නේය  .
SFX 43 0 න්නෝය  .
SFX 43 0 පන්  .
SFX 43 0 පල්ලා  .
SFX 43 0 මි  .
SFX 43 0 මිවා  .
SFX 43 0 මු  .
SFX 43 0 මුවා  .
SFX 43 0 යි  .
SFX 43 0 ව  .
SFX 43 0 වති  .
SFX 43 0 වන්නීය  .
SFX 43 0 වන්නෙමි  .
SFX 43 0 වන්නෙමු  .
SFX 43 0 වන්නෙහි  .
SFX 43 0 වන්නෙහු  .
SFX 43 0 වන්නේය  .
SFX 43 0 වන්නෝය  .
SFX 43 0 වමි  .
SFX 43 0 වමු  .
SFX 43 0 වයි  .
SFX 43 0 වහි  .
SFX 43 0 වහු  .
SFX 43 0 වු  .
SFX 43 0 හි  .
SFX 43 0 හිවා  .
SFX 43 0 හු  .
SFX 43 0 හුවා  .
SFX 43 0 ාවා  .
SFX 43 0 මින්  .
SFX 43 0 ා  .
SFX 43 0 න්නට  .
SFX 43 0 වන්නට  .
SFX 43 0 නලද  .
SFX 43 0 නුලැබූ  .
SFX 43 0 වමින්  .
SFX 43 0 ද්දී  .
SFX 43 0 නලදී  .
SFX 43 0 ුණු  .
SFX 43 0 ූ  .
SFX 43 0 ුවෙමි  .
SFX 43 0 ුවෙමු  .
SFX 43 0 ුවෙහි  .
SFX 43 0 ුවෙහු  .
SFX 43 0 ුවාය  .
SFX 43 0 ුවේය  .
SFX 43 0 ුවෝය  .
SFX 43 0 ේ  .
SFX 43 0 ෙමි  .
SFX 43 0 ෙමු  .
SFX 43 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 43 0 ෙහු  .
SFX 43 0 ෙයි  .
SFX 43 0 ෙති  .
SFX 43 0 වෙයි  .
SFX 43 0 වෙති  .
SFX 43 0 වේ  .
SFX 43 0 ිය  .
SFX 43 0 ුවොත්  .
SFX 43 0 ුවේ  .
SFX 43 0 න්නේ  .
SFX 43 0 න  .
SFX 43 0 නට  .
SFX 43 0 බලවා  .
SFX 43 0 වන්නේ  .
SFX 43 0 නුයේ  .
