en_US.dic
අඩ/30
අත්බව/30
අතීත/30
අධ්‍යයන/30
අධිකරණ/30
අන්ධකාර/30
අනුකරණ/30
අනුක්‍රම/30
අපනයන/30
අභිචාර/30
අභිධර්ම/30
අභිසමාචාර/30
අමාත්‍යාංශ/30
අඹ/30
අරගල/30
අර්බුද/30
අර්ථ/30
අවතාර/30
අවවාද/30
අවහිර/30
ආකල්ප/30
ආඝාත/30
ආචාර/30
ආණ්ඩුක්‍රම/30
ආත්මොපකාර/30
ආත්මෝපහාර/30
ආදර/30
ආදේශ/30
ආදේශක/30
ආධ්‍යාත්ම/30
ආන්දෝලන/30
ආනිශංස/30
ආනිසංස/30
ආබාධ/30
ආයුර්වේද/30
ආයෝජන/30
ආර්තව/30
ආර්ථික/30
ආරාධන/30
ආවේග/30
ඉතිහාස/30
උත්තමාචාර/30
උත්සව/30
උදාහරණ/30
උරුම/30
ඒකාධිකාර/30
ඖෂධ/30
කට්ටල/30
කඩ/30
කඹ/30
කරත්ත/30
කරදර/30
ක්‍රම/30
කාමර/30
කැට/30
ජනමත/30
තල/30
තාල/30
දඩ/30
දේශපාලන/30
නිගමන/30
ප්‍රාන්ත/30
බෝල/30
මාස/30
රාග/30
ලිපිලේඛන/30
ලෝක/30
වනාත්තර/30
වැඩ/30
ශරීර/30
සේල/30
හැඩ/30
හීන්සැර/30
අකැමැති/31
අතලොසු/31
අත්වැරැදි/31
අරුණලු/31
අලු/31
අස්වනු/31
ඇඟිලි/31
ඇදහිලි/31
ඇලපිලි/31
ඇල්ලිලි/31
ඉති/31
ඉපනැලි/31
ඉස්මතු/31
උරපතු/31
එවැනි/31
කක්කල්කැස්ස/31
කටයුතු/31
කඩුලු/31
කඳු/31
කැති/31
කැබලි/31
කැරලි/31
කැහි/31
කිනිති/31
කිලුටු/31
කුලු/31
කෙනෙහිලි/31
කොඳු/31
ගඟුලැලි/31
ගැටි/31
ගිනිදලු/31
ගොනු/31
තටු/31
තාවුලු/31
තෑගි/31
තොටිලි/31
දඬු/31
දලු/31
දැලි/31
දෑවැදි/31
දුක්ගැනවිලි/31
දෙඩවිලි/31
නැටි/31
නැමි/31
නිඳි/31
නිමිති/31
නිවුඩු/31
පතු/31
පසු/31
පළපුරුදු/31
පාපිසි/31
පැමිණිලි/31
පැළැලි/31
පිමි/31
පිහිලි/31
පුරුදු/31
පෙනෙලි/31
බඩගිනි/31
බැමි/31
බුරුතු/31
මඬුලු/31
මැදි/31
මිමි/31
රෙදි/31
ලෑලි/31
වතු/31
වැඩිලි/31
වැවිලි/31
සාගිනි/31
සෙවණැලි/31
හාදු/31
හුළුඅතු/31
හොසු/31
අකැමැත්ත/32	
අතලොස්ස/32	
අත්වැරැද්ද/32	
අරුණැල්ල/32	
අල්ල/32	
අස්වැන්න/32	
ඇඟිල්ල/32	
ඇදහිල්ල/32	
ඇලපිල්ල/32	
ඇල්ලිල්ල/32	
ඉත්ත/32	
ඉපනැල්ල/32	
ඉස්මත්ත/32	
උරපත්ත/32	
එවැන්න/32	
කක්කල්කැස්ස/32	
කටයුත්ත/32	
කඩුල්ල/32	
කන්ද/32	
කැත්ත/32	
කැබැල්ල/32	
කැරැල්ල/32	
කැස්ස/32	
කිනිත්ත/32	
කිලුට්ට/32	
කුල්ල/32	
කෙනෙහිල්ල/32	
කොන්ද/32	
ගඟුලැල්ල/32	
ගැට්ට/32	
ගිනිදල්ල/32	
ගොන්න/32	
තට්ට/32	
තාවුල්ල/32	
තෑග්ග/32	
තොටිල්ල/32	
දණ්ඩ/32	
දල්ල/32	
දැල්ල/32	
දෑවැද්ද/32	
දුක්ගැනවිල්ල/32	
දෙඩවිල්ල/32	
නැට්ට/32	
නැම්ම/32	
නින්ද/32	
නිමිත්ත/32	
නිවුඩ්ඩ/32	
පත්ත/32	
පස්ස/32	
පළපුරුද්ද/32	
පැමිණිල්ල/32	
පැළැල්ල/32	
පිම්ම/32	
පිහිල්ල/32	
පුරුද්ද/32	
පෙනෙල්ල/32	
බඩගින්න/32	
බැම්ම/32	
බුරුත්ත/32	
මඬුල්ල/32	
මැද්ද/32	
මිම්ම/32	
රෙද්ද/32	
ලෑල්ල/32	
වත්ත/32	
වැඩිල්ල/32	
වැවිල්ල/32	
සාගින්න/32	
සෙවණැල්ල/32	
හාද්ද/32	
හුළුඅත්ත/32	
හොස්ස/32	
අතිරස/33	
අපද්‍රව්‍ය/33	
අරළු/33	
අළු/33	
අළුහුනු/33	
ආනමාලු/33	
ආස්මී/33	
ඉන්ධන/33	
ඉසකේ/33	
එළකිරි/33	
කඩල/33	
කම්කටුලු/33	
කරවල/33	
කැකුණ/33	
කැලරි/33	
කිරි/33	
කුප්පමේනිය/33	
කෙණ්ඩ/33	
කේශර/33	
කොට්ටම්බා/33	
කොත්තමල්ලි/33	
කොමඩු/33	
කෝපි/33	
ගොම/33	
තනකිරි/33	
ත්‍රිපෝෂ/33	
තිරිඟු/33	
තිරුවාණා/33	
තුත්තිරි/33	
තුෂාර/33	
තෙලිඟු/33	
තේ/33	
දඹල/33	
දහයියා/33	
ධනු/33	
නියඟලා/33	
නෙරළු/33	
පසළොස්වක/33	
පාසි/33	
පැපොල/33	
පිනි/33	
පිපිඤ්ඤා/33	
පිළි/33	
පේර/33	
පොලී/33	
බණ්ඩක්කා/33	
බරවා/33	
බුදුගුණ/33	
බෝංචි/33	
මලමුත්‍ර/33	
මැයි/33	
මිණිමුතු/33	
මිදි/33	
මුකුණුවැන්න/33	
මුනිබණ/33	
මුත්‍ර/33	
යකඩ/33	
රතිඤ්ඤා/33	
රථවාහන/33	
රාබු/33	
රුයිත/33	
ලාකඩ/33	
ලිපිලේඛන/33	
ලේ/33	
වගාබිම/33	
වතුර/33	
වසර/33	
වානේ/33	
විල්ලුද/33	
සක්වළ/33	
සීනි/33	
හාරත/33	
අමුමිරිස්/34	
අයිස්/34	
අර්ශස්/34	
අසමෝදගම්/34	
අළුකෙහෙල්/34	
ඇපල්/34	
ඉළුක්/34	
ඊමේල්/34	
උඳුවප්/34	
ඒඩ්ස්/34	
ඔක්තෝබර්/34	
ඔක්සිජන්/34	
කබොක්/34	
ක්ලෝරීන්/34	
ක්‍රිකට්/34	
කාඩ්/34	
කාබන්/34	
කාබෝහයිඩ්‍රේට්/34	
කැරම්/34	
කිලෝමීටර්/34	
කෙසෙල්/34	
කෙහෙල්/34	
කොකේන්/34	
කොමිස්/34	
කොරල්/34	
කොලෙස්ටරෝල්/34	
ගම්මිරිස/34	
කෝට්/34	
කෝල්/34	
ගම්මිරිස්/34	
ගෑස්/34	
ගෙන්දගම්/34	
චීස්/34	
චුයිංගම්/34	
චුයින්ගම්/34	
චෙක්/34	
ජීප්/34	
ටින්/34	
ටියුෂන්/34	
ටෙනිස්/34	
ටෙලිග්‍රෑම්/34	
ටේප්/34	
ණයතුරුස්/34	
දෙසැම්බර්/34	
නටබුන්/34	
නවම්/34	
නිදන්/34	
නොවැම්බර්/34	
ප්ලැටිනම්/34	
ප්‍රෝටීන්/34	
පාන්/34	
පාස්/34	
පැන්/34	
පැපොල්/34	
පුළුන්/34	
පෙරුංකායම්/34	
පොසොන්/34	
බටර්/34	
බැඩ්මින්ටන/34	
මයිල්/34	
මැංගුස්/34	
මිරිස්/34	
මේස්/34	
රත්තරන්/34	
රන්/34	
රඹුටන්/34	
වයින්/34	
වල්පල්/34	
සබන්/34	
සැප්තැම්බර්/34	
සුන්බුන්/34	
සේල්/34
කව/40
කස/40
ගය/40
ගර/40
ගස/40
තන/40
තබ/40
තව/40
තළ/40
දම/40
දර/40
දව/40
නග/40
නඟ/40
නව/40
පත/40
පළ/40
බල/40
බහ/40
මක/40
මර/40
මව/40
මස/40
යව/40
ලබ/40
වඩ/40
වද/40
වර/40
වව/40
වස/40
සද/40
නට/40
සර/40
සල/40
හද/40
ගොඩනග/40
වගබල/40
අභිබව/40
පිරිමස/40
අස්වස/40
කරකව/40
පටලව/40
කෑගහ/40
ඈඳ/41
ඉර/41
ඉල්ල/41
ඉවස/41
එළ/41
එව/41
එල්ල/41
ඉක්මව/41
ඉදව/41
එළිදක්ව/41
ඒද/41
කිය/41
කිර/41
ගෙව/41
තිය/41
තෙම/41
දින/41
නෙළ/41
පීර/41
පෙර/41
බෙද/41
බේර/41
ලිය/41
විය/41
වෙළ/41
වේළ/41
සිත/41
හෙල/41
පෙන්ව/41
මෙහෙයව/41
රිස්ස/41
පිරික්ස/41
පිහිට/41
පිහිටුව/41
සිටුව/41
විසුරුව/41
විකුණ/41
විමස/41
නිපදව/41
නෙරප/41
කියව/41
තෙපල/41
කැඳව/41
පටව/42
කලත/42
කළඹ/42
කලඹ/42
දවට/42
නරඹ/42
නළව/42
පනව/42
පවර/42
පවස/42
බබළ/42
වටල/42
සපය/42
සමර/42
සරස/42
සලක/42
සලස/42
සළස/42
හඟව/42
සකස/42
පරද/42
නොසලක/42
හරිගස්ස/42
දක්ක/42
දක්ව/42
දන්ව/42
දල්ව/42
නංව/42
බස්ස/42
අගය/43
අඟව/43
අටව/43
අදහ/43
අමත/43
අඹර/43
අරඹ/43
අල්ල/43
අස/43
අඹ/43
අන/43
උය/43
උල/43
උපය/43
උස්ස/43
ඔත/43
ඔබ/43
ඔය/43
ඔසව/43
කොට/43
ගොත/43
දොඩ/43
පොව/43
පොළ/43
යොද/43
සොය/43
හොබව/43
සෝද/43
තෝර/43
පාද/43
පාර/43
දුව/43
පුද/43
පුරව/43
